Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2582.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "emergency vehicle" in section 102 of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended and the section is amended by adding a definition to read:§ 102. Definitions.Subject to additional definitions contained in subsequent provisions of this title which are applicable to specific provisions of this title, the following words and phrases when used in this title shall have, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the meanings given to them in this section:* * *"Emergency vehicle." A State or county emergency management <--12345678910111213141516171819 vehicle, fire department vehicle, police vehicle, sheriff vehicle, ambulance, advanced life support squad vehicle, basic life support squad vehicle, emergency canteen support service organization vehicle, blood delivery vehicle, human organ delivery vehicle, hazardous material response vehicle, armed forces emergency vehicle, one vehicle operated by a coroner or chief county medical examiner and one vehicle operated by a chief deputy coroner or deputy chief county medical examiner used for answering emergency calls, a vehicle owned by or leased to a regional emergency medical services council that is used as authorized by the Department of Health to respond to an actual or potential disaster, mass casualty situation or substantial threat to public health, a vehicle owned by a county or regional police association and operated by a police officer that is used for police transport or victim extraction, a vehicle that is owned and operated by a county correctional institution [in a city of the first class] and used to respond to an emergency at a correctional institution [in a city of the first class] or to escort an ambulance which is transporting sick or injured prisoners [in a city of the first class], any vehicle operated by a special agent, special agent supervisor, narcotics agent or narcotics agent supervisor while performing official duties as employees of the Office of Attorney General, any vehicle owned and operated by the Philadelphia Parking Authority established in accordance with 53 Pa.C.S. Ch. 55 (relating to parking authorities) and used in the enforcement of 53 Pa.C.S. Ch. 57 (relating to taxicabs and limousines in first class cities), a vehicle owned by a city of the first class and operated by first judicial district certified armed probation officers, a State parole fugitive apprehension emergency vehicle, a vehicle owned 20260HB2582PN3649 - 2 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and operated by the Pennsylvania Turnpike Commission that is used by an emergency service responder as dispatched by the Pennsylvania Turnpike Commission's traffic operations center, or any other vehicle designated by the State Police under section 6106 (relating to designation of emergency vehicles by Pennsylvania State Police), or a privately owned vehicle used in answering an emergency call when used by any of the following:(1) A police chief and assistant chief.(2) A fire chief, assistant chief and, when a fire company has three or more fire vehicles, a second or third assistant chief.(3) A fire police captain and fire police lieutenant.(4) An ambulance corps commander and assistant commander.(5) A river rescue commander and assistant commander.(6) A county emergency management coordinator.(7) A fire marshal.(8) A rescue service chief and assistant chief.(9) The chief or operations director of a county hazardous materials response team.(10) A police officer who is also a member of a county or regional municipal special emergency response team which is authorized to respond to emergencies under 42 Pa.C.S. § 8953 (relating to Statewide municipal police jurisdiction).* * *"State parole fugitive apprehension emergency vehicle." A motor vehicle operated by an agent, as defined in 61 Pa.C.S. § 6101 (relating to definitions), that is used to respond to an emergency or an activity of law enforcement and meets the following criteria:20260HB2582PN3649 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) The operator has completed an emergency vehicle operator training course approved by the Department of Corrections.(2) The motor vehicle is:(i) engaged in the apprehension of an absconder or escapee;(ii) responding to a confirmed escape;(iii) responding to an immediate threat to public safety; or(iv) assisting a Federal, State or local law enforcement agency in this Commonwealth, including task force operations.(3) The motor vehicle is in compliance with the written emergency vehicle policy governing the use, supervision, safety and reporting of State parole fugitive apprehension emergency vehicles developed and implemented by the Department of Corrections.* * *SECTION 2. SECTION 3105(D.1) OF TITLE 75 IS AMENDED TO READ:§ 3105. DRIVERS OF EMERGENCY VEHICLES.* * *(D.1) VEHICLES OWNED AND OPERATED BY A COUNTY CORRECTIONAL INSTITUTION [IN A CITY OF THE FIRST CLASS].--THE DRIVER OF A VEHICLE THAT IS OWNED AND OPERATED BY A COUNTY CORRECTIONAL INSTITUTION [IN A CITY OF THE FIRST CLASS] AND USED TO RESPOND TO AN EMERGENCY AT A CORRECTIONAL INSTITUTION [IN A CITY OF THE FIRST CLASS] OR TO ESCORT AN AMBULANCE WHICH IS TRANSPORTING A SICK OR INJURED PRISONER [IN A CITY OF THE FIRST CLASS] SHALL COMPLY WITH MAXIMUM SPEED LIMITS, RED SIGNAL INDICATIONS AND STOP SIGNS. AFTER ASCERTAINING THAT THE VEHICLE WILL BE GIVEN 20260HB2582PN3649 - 4 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 THE RIGHT-OF-WAY, THE DRIVER MAY PROCEED THROUGH A RED SIGNAL INDICATION OR STOP SIGN.* * *Section 2 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2582PN3649 - 5 - <--1234